Hawaii statutes.
§198D-4 Classification. The department
shall classify each trail and access in the inventories according to the
following:

(1) Function;

(2) Type;

(3) Theme;

(4) Actual and desired use intensity; and

(5) Any other classification deemed necessary or
desirable by the department. [L 1988, c 236, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 53, §1(2)]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next